Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF493.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2500YH (2) 91 th/ns H.F. 493 DIVISION I 1 REQUIRED PLACEMENT OF TRAFFIC-CONTROL SIGNALS 2 Section 1. Section 321.345, Code 2025, is amended to read 3 as follows: 4 321.345 Stop or yield at highways ââ signal required . 5 1. The department, based Based on an engineering study, 6 the department with reference respect to primary highways, 7 and a local authorities authority with reference respect to 8 other highways under their the local authorityâs jurisdiction , 9 may designate through highways and erect stop signs or yield 10 signs , in accordance with specifications established by the 11 department at specified entrances to the highway , or may 12 designate any intersection as a stop intersection or as a yield 13 intersection and erect like signs at one or more entrances to 14 such intersection. 15 2. The department shall erect and maintain one or more 16 official traffic-control signals at the intersection of United 17 States highway 18, including where the highway designation 18 overlaps with black forest road or 320th street in the city of 19 Hull, and division street in the city of Hull. 20 DIVISION II 21 CONSTRUCTION OF OVERPASS OVER RAILWAY TRACKS 22 Sec. 2. Section 364.8, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, 23 is amended to read as follows: 24 A city may by ordinance require a railway company operating 25 railway tracks on or across a city street or nonprimary 26 highway within the city limits to construct or reconstruct, 27 and maintain, an overpass or underpass to permit the street to 28 pass over or under the tracks, and may establish specifications 29 for the construction or reconstruction of such an overpass or 30 underpass, subject to the following: 31 Sec. 3. Section 364.8, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 32 to read as follows: 33 1. The requirement may shall not be enforced until the Iowa 34 state department of transportation approves the specifications 35 -1- LSB 2500YH (2) 91 th/ns 1/ 3 H.F. 493 for a construction or reconstruction, after examination and a 1 determination that the overpass or underpass is necessary for 2 public safety and convenience. The department shall approve 3 construction of an overpass in Plymouth county on county 4 highway C44 over the railway tracks located within the city of 5 Merrill on the east side of the city. 6